Washington statutes.
RCW 18.106.180

Notice of infraction—Issuance, service.

(1) An authorized representative of the department may issue a notice of infraction as specified in RCW 18.106.020 if:

(a) A person who is doing plumbing work or who is offering to do plumbing work fails to produce evidence of:

(i) Having a certificate or permit issued by the department in accordance with this chapter, or being supervised by a person who has such a certificate or permit; and

(ii) Until January 1, 2021, being registered as a contractor as required under chapter 18.27 RCW, or being employed by a person who is registered as a contractor as required under chapter 18.27 RCW;

(b) Until January 1, 2021, a person who employs anyone, or offers or advertises to employ anyone, to do plumbing work fails to produce evidence of being registered as a contractor as required under chapter 18.27 RCW;

(c) After January 1, 2021, a person who employs anyone, or offers or advertises to employ anyone, to do plumbing work fails to produce evidence of being licensed as a plumbing contractor as required under this chapter; or

(d) A contractor violates RCW 18.106.320.

(2) A notice of infraction issued under this section shall be personally served on the person or contractor named in the notice by an authorized representative of the department or sent using a method by which the mailing can be tracked or the delivery can be confirmed to the last known address provided to the department of the person named in the notice.

[ 2020 c 153 s 15; 2011 c 301 s 5; 2002 c 82 s 3; 2000 c 171 s 27; 1996 c 147 s 4; 1994 c 174 s 3; 1983 c 124 s 7.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1994 c 174: See note following RCW 18.106.020.

Effective date—1983 c 124: See note following RCW 18.106.020.